Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.095

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Grounds—Request for hearing.

(1) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke any license required under this chapter if the director determines that an applicant or licensee has committed any of the following acts:

(a) Refused, neglected, or failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or any lawful order of the director;

(b) Refused, neglected, or failed to keep and maintain records required under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter to make the records available to the director on request;

(c) Refused the director access to any facilities or parts of the facilities for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; or

(d) Refused, neglected, or failed to comply with any provisions of chapter 15.130 RCW or rules adopted under that chapter.

(2) Upon receipt of notice by the director to deny, suspend, or revoke a license, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2018 c 236 s 710; 2000 c 99 s 10; 1994 c 128 s 1; 1985 c 415 s 12. Formerly RCW 16.49.444.]